Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.03
Aircraft fuel; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of aircraft fuel as defined under Chapter 3, article 1.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 27.